Virginia statutes. Title 57. Religious and Charitable Matters; Cemeteries.
Article 7. Cremation.

§ 57-39.19.
Application of §§ 54.1-2818.1 through 54.1-2818.3.

The provisions of §§

54.1-2818.1

through

54.1-2818.3

shall apply to the cremation of any dead human body.

History.

1979, c. 724.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, “ §§

54.1-2818.1

through

54.1-2818.3

” was substituted for “Article 4 ( §

32.1-305

et seq.) of Chapter 8 of Title 32.1” in the text and the section heading to conform to Acts
1998, c. 867.